italian.dict
abbreviare/ABCGKOSVY1
accanire/ABCGKOSVY1
accettare/ABCGKOSVY1z
accorare/ABCGKOSVY1
acuire/ABCGKOSVY1
adire/ABCGKOSVY1
affievolire/ABCGKOSVY1
agghiacciare/ABCGKOSVY1
agguantare/ABCGKOSVY1z
allegorizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
alzare/ABCGKOSVY1
amministrare/ABCGKOSVY1
anatomizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
annusare/ABCGKOSVY1
appestare/ABCGKOSVY1
approntare/ABCGKOSVY1
armeggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
arrossare/ABCGKOSVY1
assaggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
assolvere/ABDGKOTWY1
attestare/ABCGKOSVY1
autentificare/ABCGKOSVY1
avariare/ABCGKOSVY1
avvoltolare/ABCGKOSVY1
baloccare/ABCGKOSVY1
bastonare/ABCGKOSVY1
biascicare/ABCGKOSVY1
blaterare/ABCGKOSVY1
brancicare/ABCGKOSVY1
bufferizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
calciare/ABCGKOSVY1
canzonare/ABCGKOSVY1
carpire/ABCGKOSVY1
censurare/ABCGKOSVY1
cicalare/ABCGKOSVY1
clorurare/ABCGKOSVY1
colonizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
compiacere/ABCGKOTWY1
concitare/ABCGKOSVY1
confluire/ABCGKOSVY1
consociare/ABCGKOSVY1
contrastare/ABCGKOSVY1
coreografare/ABCGKOSVY1
coventrizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
cumulare/ABCGKOSVY1
decerebrare/ABCGKOSVY1
decurtare/ABCGKOSVY1
deificare/ABCGKOSVY1
denominare/ABCGKOSVY1
deragliare/ABCGKOSVY1
detergere/ABDGKOUXY1
digredire/ABCGKOSVY1
diramare/ABCGKOSVY1
disavvezzare/ABCGKOSVY1
disfare/ABCGMQTWZ2
disimballare/ABCGKOSVY1
disobbedire/ABCGLPSVY1
disossidare/ABCGKOSVY1
dissotterrare/ABCGKOSVY1
disubbidire/ABCGLPSVY1
divulgare/ABCGKOSVY1
eccepire/ABCGKOSVY1
eludere/ABDGKOTWY1
equivocare/ABCGKOSVY1
esaurire/ABCGLPSVY1
esemplare/ABCGKOSVY1
esportare/ABCGKOSVY1
eterificare/ABCGKOSVY1
fanatizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
fiammare/ABCGKOSVY1
fistulare/ABCGKOSVY1
fornire/ABCGKOSVY1
freddare/ABCGKOSVY1
fumigare/ABCGKOSVY1
gemellare/1ABCGKOSVYa
giocherellare/ABCGKOSVY1
gocciolare/ABCGKOSVY1
grattugiare/ABCGKOSVY1
idealizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
imbattere/ABCGKOSVY1
imbozzimare/ABCGKOSVY1
immedesimare/ABCGKOSVY1
impaniare/ABCGKOSVY1
impennacchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
impiotare/ABCGKOSVY1
impugnare/ABCGKOSVY1
incacchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
incaricare/ABCGKOSVY1
incenerire/ABCGKOSVY1
includere/ABDGKOTWY1
incrudire/ABCGKOSVY1
indossare/ABCGKOSVY1
infialettare/ABCGKOSVY1
inforestierare/ABCGKOSVY1
ingarbugliare/ABCGKOSVY1
ingorgare/ABCGKOSVY1
innervosire/ABCGKOSVY1
inseminare/ABCGKOSVY1
intarsiare/ABCGKOSVY1
interpellare/ABCGKOSVY1
intossicare/ABCGKOSVY1
inumidire/ABCGKOSVY1
invischiare/ABCGKOSVY1
irretire/ABCGKOSVY1
iugulare/ABCGKOSVY1
legare/ABCGKOSVY1
lisciare/ABCGKOSVY1
madrigaleggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
mareggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
meccanizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
metanizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
mischiare/ABCGKOSVY1
monitorare/ABCGKOSVY1
mungere/ABDGKOSVY1
nicchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
obbedire/ABCGLPSVY1
occasionare/ABCGKOSVY1
oppiare/ABCGKOSVY1
osservare/ABCGKOSVY1z
paganizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
parancare/ABCGKOSVY1
partorire/ABCGLPSVY1
patentare/ABCGKOSVY1
patire/ABCGLPSVY1
pensare/ABCGKOSVY1
perpetuare/ABCGKOSVY1
picconare/ABCGKOSVY1
pizzicare/ABCGKOSVY1
popolarizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
precisare/ABCGKOSVY1
preludiare/ABCGKOSVY1
prevaricare/ABCGKOSVY1
progettare/ABCGKOSVY1
prostituire/ABCGKOSVY1
punzonare/ABCGKOSVY1
raccare/ABCGKOSVY1
radiotrasmettere/ABDGKOTWY1
raggrumolare/ABCGKOSVY1
rannodare/ABCGKOSVY1
ratificare/ABCGKOSVY1
reclamare/ABCGKOSVY1
reimpostare/ABCGKOSVY1
reputare/ABCGKOSVY1
riabbellire/ABCGKOSVY1
riaggiustare/ABCGKOSVY1
riassettare/ABCGKOSVY1
ricalibrare/ABCGKOSVY1
ricomunicare/ABCGKOSVY1
ridefinire/ABCGKOSVY1
rientrare/ABCGKOSVY1
rifrangere/ABDGKOSUVXY1
rilevare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimembrare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimpoverire/ABCGKOSVY1
rincuorare/ABCGKOSVY1
rinnestare/ABCGKOSVY1
rinunciare/ABCGKOSVY1
ripigliare/ABCGKOSVY1
rischiarire/ABCGKOSVY1
ritornare/ABCGKOSVY1
ruspare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbalzare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbrindellare/ABCGKOSVY1
scapitare/ABCGKOSVY1
schiavizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
scondizionare/ABCGKOSVY1
sculettare/ABCGKOSVY1
sezionare/ABCGKOSVY1
sfrecciare/ABCGKOSVY1
shockare/ABCGKOSVY1
smazzare/ABCGKOSVY1
soddisfare/ABCGMQTWYZ12
solare/ABCGKOSVY1
soqquadrare/ABCGKOSVY1
spacchettare/ABCGKOSVY1
sperimentare/ABCGKOSVY1
spolmonare/ABCGKOSVY1
stabbiare/ABCGKOSVY1
stipendiare/ABCGKOSVY1
strepitare/ABCGKOSVY1
suffragare/ABCGKOSVY1
svignare/ABCGKOSVY1
tatuare/ABCGKOSVY1
testificare/ABCGKOSVY1
traforare/ABCGKOSVY1
trasporre/ABCGKOSVY1
tubare/ABCGKOSVY1
ubbidire/ABCGLPSVY1
validare/ABCGKOSVY1
vincolare/1ABCGKOSVYa
zoomare/ABCGKOSVY1
